pt-BR: Bomba d’água material do rotor: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Ferro fundido; Compósito; Plástico; Aço; Outros
en: Water pump impeller material: Aluminum; Brass; Bronze; Cast iron; Composite; Plastic; Steel; Other
bg-BG: Материал на работното колело на водната помпа: Алуминий; Месинг; Бронз; Чугун; Композитен материал; Пластмаса; Стомана; Други
es: Material del impulsor de la bomba de agua: Aluminio; Latón; Bronce; Hierro fundido; Compuesto; Plástico; Acero; Otro
cs: Materiál oběžného kola vodního čerpadla: Hliník; Mosaz; Bronz; Litina; Kompozit; Plast; Ocel; Jiný
ja: ウォーターポンプインペラ素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; ブロンズ; 鋳鉄; 複合材; プラスチック; スチール; その他
pt-PT: Material do impulsor da bomba de água: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Ferro fundido; Compósito; Plástico; Aço; Outro
pl: Materiał wirnika pompy wody: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Brąz; Żeliwo; Kompozyt; Plastik; Stal; Inne
vi: Vật liệu cánh quạt bơm nước: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Đồng thanh; Gang; Composite; Nhựa; Thép; Khác
sk-SK: Materiál obežného kolesa vodného čerpadla: Hliník; Mosadz; Bronz; Liatina; Kompozit; Plast; Oceľ; Iné
fr: Matériau de la turbine de la pompe à eau: Aluminium; Laiton; Bronze; Fonte; Composite; Plastique; Acier; Autre
th: วัสดุใบพัดปั๊มน้ำ: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; บรอนซ์; เหล็กหล่อ; คอมโพสิต; พลาสติก; เหล็กกล้า; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Vandens siurblio darbaračio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Bronza; Ketus; Kompozitas; Plastikas; Plienas; Kita
ro-RO: Materialul rotorului pompei de apă: Aluminiu; Alamă; Bronz; Fontă; Compozit; Plastic; Oțel; Altele
zh-CN: 水泵叶轮材料: 铝; 黄铜; 青铜; 铸铁; 复合材料; 塑料; 钢; 其他
el: Υλικό πτερωτής αντλίας νερού: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Μπρούτζος; Χυτοσίδηρος; Σύνθετο υλικό; Πλαστικό; Χάλυβας; Άλλο
ru: Материал крыльчатки водяного насоса: Алюминий; Латунь; Бронза; Чугун; Композит; Пластик; Сталь; Другое
sl-SI: Material tekača vodne črpalke: Aluminij; Medenina; Bron; Lito železo; Kompozit; Plastika; Jeklo; Drugo
da: Materiale i vandpumpehjul: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Støbejern; Komposit; Plastik; Stål; Andet
de: Material des Wasserpumpenlaufrads: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Gusseisen; Verbundwerkstoff; Kunststoff; Stahl; Sonstige
sv: Vattenpumpens impellermaterial: Aluminium; Mässing; Brons; Gjutjärn; Komposit; Plast; Stål; Övrigt
tr: Su pompası pervanesi malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bronz; Dökme demir; Kompozit; Plastik; Çelik; Diğer
hr-HR: Materijal impelera vodene crpke: Aluminij; Mjed; Bronca; Lijevano željezo; Kompozit; Plastika; Čelik; Ostalo
it: Materiale della girante della pompa dell'acqua: Alluminio; Ottone; Bronzo; Ghisa; Materiale composito; Plastica; Acciaio; Altro
hu: Vízszivattyú járókerék anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Öntöttvas; Kompozit; Műanyag; Acél; Egyéb
zh-TW: 水泵葉輪材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 青銅; 鑄鐵; 複合材質; 塑膠; 鋼; 其他
fi: Vesipumpun juoksupyörän materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Pronssi; Valurauta; Komposiitti; Muovi; Teräs; Muu
nb: Materiale i vannpumpens løpehjul: Aluminium; Messing; Bronse; Støpejern; Kompositt; Plast; Stål; Annet
nl: Waterpomp waaier materiaal: Aluminium; Messing; Brons; Gietijzer; Composiet; Plastic; Staal; Overige
ko: 워터 펌프 임펠러 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 청동; 주철; 복합재; 플라스틱; 강철; 기타